Mississippi, session 2026, SB2463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43-27-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-27-33.  (1) Nothing in this chapter is intended to limit or restrict the operation and effect of Title IV, federal Social Security Act (Subchapter IV, Sections 601-604, Chapter 7, Title 42, U.S. Code Annotated) and Sections 43-15-1 through 43-15-9, inclusive, 43-17-1 through 43-17-25, inclusive, 43-25-1 through 43-25-17, inclusive, and 93-11-1 through 93-11-63, inclusive, Mississippi Code of 1972, which authorize the Department of Human Services to expend appropriated state and available federal funds for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) child welfare services, and administer the interstate compact on juveniles under approved state-federal plans now in effect; this chapter being cumulative and supplementary.  Nothing in this chapter is intended to limit or restrain the operation and effect of the Youth Court Law of 1946, as amended (Chapter 21 of this Title), or the Family Court Law of 1964, as amended (Chapter 23 of this Title), or the power granted to the youth courts or family courts therein outlined.  The intent of this section is to * * * insure ensure that the final responsibility for a delinquent youth resides with the court that has jurisdiction and that the final responsibility for any and all services provided by any and all personnel assigned to a youth or family court resides with the responsible judge. (2)  During each fiscal year, the department shall transfer to the Child Care and Development Fund (CCDF) at least thirty percent (30%) of the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) block grant received by the state for that fiscal year or the maximum amount allowed by law, whichever is more, to be used as vouchers to pay for child care for qualifying children under the Child Care Payment Program (CCPP). SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.